src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! Verb inflection
!! ---------------
!! The LATVIAN language verbs inflect in persons.

LEXICON Persons
+V+1sg:en   #   ;
+V+2sg:et   #   ;
+V+3sg:e    #   ;
+V+1pl:ien  #   ;
+V+2pl:iet  #   ;
+V+3pl:iet  #   ;
+V+inf:0    #   ;
#:0   Nouns   ;

LEXICON V_15_
+V@U.DEB.ON@:%^JPal@U.DEB.ON@ DEB ;
@U.DEB.OFF@  V_15_FINITE_ ;
@U.DEB.OFF@  V_15_NONFINITE_ ;

LEXICON V_15_FINITE_
+V+Inf:%>t # ;
+V+Ind+Fut+Sg1:%>šu # ;
+V+Ind+Fut+Sg2:%>si # ;
+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1:%>sim # ;
+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2:%>siet # ;
+V+Ind+Fut+SP3:%>s # ;

+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%^RVow%>u # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%^RVow%^K2C # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%^RVow%>am # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%^RVow%>at # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+SP3:%^RVow # ;

+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg1:%>u # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg2:%>i # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl1:%>ām # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl2:%>āt # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prt+SP3:%>a # ;

LEXICON V_15_RAKT
+V@U.DEB.ON@:%^RVow@U.DEB.ON@ DEB ;
!@U.DEB.OFF@  V_15_RAKT_FINITE_ ;
!@U.DEB.OFF@  V_15_RAKT_NONFINITE_ ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prs+SP3@U.DEB.OFF@:%^RVow%^SP3000@U.DEB.OFF@  # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prs+Sg2@U.DEB.OFF@:%^RVow%^K2C000@U.DEB.OFF@  # ;
+V+Imprt+Sg2@U.DEB.OFF@:%^RVow%^K2C0@U.DEB.OFF@  # ;
+V+Imprt+Pl2000@U.DEB.OFF@:%^RVow%^K2C%>iet@U.DEB.OFF@  # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prt+SP3@U.DEB.OFF@:%>a000@U.DEB.OFF@  # ;
+V+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef@U.DEB.OFF@:%^K2C%>is000@U.DEB.OFF@  # ;
+V+Der/iens0@U.DEB.OFF@:%^K2C%>ien@U.DEB.OFF@  N_1_ ;
00@U.DEB.OFF@:%^RVow0@U.DEB.OFF@  V_15_PRS-SG1-STEM ;
@U.DEB.OFF@:@U.DEB.OFF@  V_15_PRT-SG1-STEM ;
@U.DEB.OFF@:@U.DEB.OFF@ V_15_FUT-SG1-STEM ;

LEXICON V_15_RAKT_FINITE_
+V+Inf:%>t # ;
+V+Ind+Fut+Sg1:%>šu # ;
+V+Ind+Fut+Sg2:%>si # ;
+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1:%>sim # ;
+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2:%>siet # ;
+V+Ind+Fut+SP3:%>s # ;

+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%^RVow%>u # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%^RVow%^K2C # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%^RVow%>am # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%^RVow%>at # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+SP3:%^RVow # ;

+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg1:%>u # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg2:%>i # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl1:%>ām # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl2:%>āt # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prt+SP3:%>a # ;

+V+Quo+Fut:%>šot # ;
+V+Cond:%>tu # ;

LEXICON V_15_4_STUMT !!≈ * __@CODE@__ stumt:stum
+V@U.DEB.ON@:%^JPal@U.DEB.ON@ DEB ;
!@U.DEB.OFF@  V_15_4_STUMT_FINITE_ ;
!@U.DEB.OFF@  V_15_NONFINITE_ ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prs+SP3@U.DEB.OFF@:%^JPal%^SP3000@U.DEB.OFF@  # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prt+SP3@U.DEB.OFF@:%^VowL%>a%^SP3000@U.DEB.OFF@  # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prs+Sg2@U.DEB.OFF@:%^JPal0000@U.DEB.OFF@  # ;
+V+Imprt+Sg2@U.DEB.OFF@:%^JPal@U.DEB.OFF@  # ;
+V+Imprt+Pl2000@U.DEB.OFF@:%^JPal%>iet@U.DEB.OFF@  # ;
+V+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef@U.DEB.OFF@:%^VowL%>is000@U.DEB.OFF@  # ;
+V+Der/iens0@U.DEB.OFF@:%^VowL%>ien@U.DEB.OFF@  N_1_ ;

00@U.DEB.OFF@:%^JPal@U.DEB.OFF@  V_15_PRS-SG1-STEM ;
00@U.DEB.OFF@:%^VowL@U.DEB.OFF@  V_15_PRT-SG1-STEM ;
@U.DEB.OFF@:@U.DEB.OFF@ V_15_FUT-SG1-STEM ;



LEXICON V_15_4_STUMT_FINITE_
+V+Inf:%>t # ;
+V+Ind+Fut+Sg1:%>šu # ;
+V+Ind+Fut+Sg2:%>si # ;
+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1:%>sim # ;
+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2:%>siet # ;
+V+Ind+Fut+SP3:%>s # ;

+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%^JPal%>u # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%^JPal # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%^JPal%>am # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%^JPal%>at # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+SP3:%^JPal%^SP3 # ;

+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg1:%^VowL%>u # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg2:%^VowL%>i # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl1:%^VowL%>ām # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl2:%^VowL%>āt # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prt+SP3:%^VowL%>a # ;

LEXICON V_15_5_SALT !!≈ * __@CODE@__ salt:sal
+V@U.DEB.ON@:st@U.DEB.ON@ DEB ;
!@U.DEB.OFF@  V_15_5_SALT_FINITE_ ;
!@U.DEB.OFF@  V_15_NONFINITE_ ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prs+Sg2@U.DEB.OFF@:sti00@U.DEB.OFF@  # ;
+V+Imprt+Sg2@U.DEB.OFF@:sti@U.DEB.OFF@  # ;
+V+Imprt+Pl2000@U.DEB.OFF@:st%>iet@U.DEB.OFF@  # ;
+V+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef@U.DEB.OFF@:%^VowL%>is000@U.DEB.OFF@  # ;
+V+Der/iens0@U.DEB.OFF@:%^K2C%>ien@U.DEB.OFF@  N_1_ ;

00@U.DEB.OFF@:st@U.DEB.OFF@  V_15_PRS-SG1-STEM ;
00@U.DEB.OFF@:st@U.DEB.OFF@  V_15_PRT-SG1-STEM ;
@U.DEB.OFF@:@U.DEB.OFF@ V_15_FUT-SG1-STEM ;

LEXICON V_15_5_SALT_FINITE_

+V+Inf:%>t # ;
+V+Ind+Fut+Sg1:%>šu # ;
+V+Ind+Fut+Sg2:%>si # ;
+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1:%>sim # ;
+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2:%>siet # ;
+V+Ind+Fut+SP3:%>s # ;

+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>stu # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>sti # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>stam # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>stat # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+SP3:%>st # ;

+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg1:%>u # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg2:%>i # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl1:%>ām # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl2:%>āt # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prt+SP3:%>a # ;
+V+Quo+Fut:%>šot # ;
+V+Cond:%>tu # ;

LEXICON V_15_NONFINITE_
+V+PrfPrc+Pss:%>t NMN_13_ ;
+V+Der/šana:%>šan N_7ROKA_ ;
+V+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2:%^VowL%>dam PRSPRC-ACT-PRED2 ;
+V+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>is # ;
+V+PrfPrc+Act: PSTPRC-ACT-OBLIQUE ;
+V+Der/iens:%^VowL%>ien N_1_ ;


+V+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2:%>stot # ;
+V+Quo+Prs:%>stot # ;
+V+Imprt+Sg2:sti # ;
+V+Imprt+Pl2:%>stiet # ;

+V+PrsPrc+Act:%>stoš NMN_13_ ;
+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def:%>stošais # ;
+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def:%>stošo # ;

+V+Der/Adv+Adv+Pos:%>stoši # ;

+V+PrsPrc+Pss:%>stam NMN_13_ ;
+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def:%>stamo # ;
+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Pred2:%>stam # ;

LEXICON V_15_FUT-SG1-STEM
+V+Inf:%>t # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Fut+Sg1:%>šu # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Fut+Sg2:%>si # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Fut+Pl1:%>sim # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Fut+Pl2:%>siet # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Fut+SP3:%>s # ;

+V+Quo+Fut:%>šot # ;
+V+Cond:%>tu # ;

+V+PrfPrc+Pss:%>t NMN_13_ ;
+V+Der/šana:%>šan N_7ROKA_ ;
+V+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2:%^VowL%>dam PRSPRC-ACT-PRED2 ;
!+V+PrfPrc+Act: PSTPRC-ACT-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON V_15_PRS-SG1-STEM
+V+Ind+Act+Prs+Sg1:%>u # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prs+Pl1:%>am # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prs+Pl2:%>at # ;

+V+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2:%>ot # ;
+V+Quo+Prs:%>ot # ;

+V+PrsPrc+Act:%>oš NMN_13_ ;
+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def:%>ošais # ;
+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def:%>ošo # ;

+V+Der/Adv+Adv+Pos:%>oši # ;
+V+PrsPrc+Pss:%>am NMN_13_ ;
+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def:%>amo # ;
+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Pred2:%>am # ;


LEXICON V_15_PRT-SG1-STEM
+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg1:%>u # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg2:%>i # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl1:%>am # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl2:%>at # ;

+V+PrfPrc+Act: PSTPRC-ACT-OBLIQUE ;


LEXICON V_15_RAKT_NONFINITE_
+V+PrfPrc+Pss:%>t NMN_13_ ;
+V+Der/šana:%>šan N_7ROKA_ ;
+V+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2:%^VowL%>dam PRSPRC-ACT-PRED2 ;
+V+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%^K2C%>is # ;
+V+PrfPrc+Act: PSTPRC-ACT-OBLIQUE ;
+V+Der/iens:%^K2C%>ien N_1_ ;


+V+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2:%^RVow%>ot # ;
+V+Quo+Prs:%^RVow%>ot # ;
+V+Imprt+Sg2:%^RVow%^K2C # ;
+V+Imprt+Pl2:%^RVow%^K2C%>iet # ;

+V+PrsPrc+Act:%^RVow%>oš NMN_13_ ;
+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def:%^RVow%>ošais # ;
+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def:%^RVow%>ošo # ;

+V+Der/Adv+Adv+Pos:%^RVow%>oši # ;

+V+PrsPrc+Pss:%^RVow%>am NMN_13_ ;
+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def:%^RVow%>amo # ;
+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Pred2:%^RVow%>am # ;


LEXICON V_16_DEJOT !!≈ * __@CODE@__ dejot:dejo oāēī
+V@U.DEB.ON@:0@U.DEB.ON@ DEB-PRS ;
+V@U.DEB.ON@:j@U.DEB.ON@ DEB-QUO ;
@U.DEB.OFF@  V_16_DEJOT_FINITE_ ;
@U.DEB.OFF@  V_16_DEJOT_NONFINITE_ ;

LEXICON V_16_DEJOT_FINITE_
+V+Inf:%>t # ;
+V+Ind+Fut+Sg1:%>šu # ;
+V+Ind+Fut+Sg2:%>si # ;
+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1:%>sim # ;
+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2:%>siet # ;
+V+Ind+Fut+SP3:%>s # ;

+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>ju # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>jam # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>jat # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+SP3: # ;

+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg1:%>ju # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg2:%>ji # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl1:%>jām # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl2:%>jāt # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prt+SP3:%>ja # ;

LEXICON V_16_DEJOT_NONFINITE_
+V+Quo+Prs:j%>ot # ;
+V+Quo+Fut:%>šot # ;

+V+PrfPrc+Pss:%>t NMN_13_ ;
+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def:%>to # ;
+V+Der/šana:%>šan N_7ROKA_ ;

+V+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2:%>dam PRSPRC-ACT-PRED2 ;
+V+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2:%>jot # ;

+V+Imprt+Sg2: # ;
+V+Imprt+Pl2:j%>iet # ;

+V+PrsPrc+Act:%^RVow%>još NMN_13_ ;
+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def:%^RVow%>jošais # ;
+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def:%^RVow%>jošo # ;

+V+Der/Adv+Adv+Pos:%^RVow%>joši # ;

+V+PrsPrc+Pss:%^RVow%>jam NMN_13_ ;
+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def:%^RVow%>jamo # ;

+V+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>jis # ;
+V+PrfPrc+Act:j PSTPRC-ACT-OBLIQUE ;
+V+Der/iens:%^K2C%>ien N_1_ ;

+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Pred2:%^RVow%>jam # ;
+V+Cond:%>tu # ;


LEXICON V_17_REDZĒT !!≈ * __@CODE@__ redzēt:redzē oāēī
+V+Deb+Prs@U.DEB.ON@:%^VowRM%>a@U.DEB.ON@ # ;
+V+Deb+Quo0@U.DEB.ON@:%^VowRM%>ot@U.DEB.ON@ # ;
@U.DEB.OFF@  V_17_REDZĒT_FINITE_ ;
@U.DEB.OFF@  V_17_REDZĒT_NONFINITE_ ;
+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def@U.DEB.OFF@:%>to0000@U.DEB.OFF@ # ;

LEXICON V_17_REDZĒT_FINITE_
+V+Inf:%>t # ;
+V+Ind+Fut+Sg1:%>šu # ;
+V+Ind+Fut+Sg2:%>si # ;
+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1:%>sim # ;
+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2:%>siet # ;
+V+Ind+Fut+SP3:%>s # ;

+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%^VowRM%>u # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%^VowRM%>i # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%^VowRM%>am # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%^VowRM%>at # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+SP3:%^VowRM%>a # ;

+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg1:%>ju # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg2:%>ji # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl1:%>jām # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl2:%>jāt # ;
+V+Ind+Act+Prt+SP3:%>ja # ;

LEXICON V_17_REDZĒT_NONFINITE_
+V+Quo+Fut:%>šot # ;
+V+PrfPrc+Pss:%>t NMN_13_ ;
+V+Der/šana:%>šan N_7ROKA_ ;

+V+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2:%>dam PRSPRC-ACT-PRED2 ;
+V+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2:%^VowRM%>ot # ;

+V+Quo+Prs:%^VowRM%>ot # ;
+V+Imprt+Sg2:%^VowRM%>i # ;
+V+Imprt+Pl2:%^VowRM%>iet # ;

+V+PrsPrc+Act:%^VowRM%>oš NMN_13_ ;
+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def:%^VowRM%>ošais # ;
+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def:%^VowRM%>ošo # ;

+V+Der/Adv+Adv+Pos:%^VowRM%>oši # ;

+V+PrsPrc+Pss:%^VowRM%>am NMN_13_ ;
+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def:%^VowRM%>am%>o # ;

+V+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:jis # ;
+V+PrfPrc+Act:j PSTPRC-ACT-OBLIQUE ;
+V+Der/iens:%^K2C%>ien N_1_ ;

+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Pred2:%^VowRM%>am # ;
+V+Cond:%>tu # ;
+V:%^RVow DEB ;

LEXICON DEB
!+Deb+Prs@R.DEB.ON@:00@R.DEB.ON@ # ;
!+Deb+Quo0@R.DEB.ON@:%>ot@R.DEB.ON@ # ;

 @U.DEB.ON@ DEB-PRS ;
 @U.DEB.ON@ DEB-QUO ;

LEXICON DEB-PRS
+Deb+Prs: # ;
LEXICON DEB-QUO
+Deb+Quo:%>ot # ;

LEXICON PRSPRC-ACT-PRED2
+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>s # ;
+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>i # ;
+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>a # ;
+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>as # ;


LEXICON PSTPRC-ACT-OBLIQUE
+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>uša # ;
+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ušam # ;
+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>ušu # ;
+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef:%>ušā # ;
+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>uši # ;
+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ušu # ;
+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>ušiem # ;
+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ušus # ;
+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef:%>ušos # ;
+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def:%>ušais # ;
+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def:%>ušā # ;
+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:%>ušajam # ;
+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def:%>ušo # ;
+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def:%>ušajā # ;
+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def:%>ušais # ;
+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def:%>ušie # ;
+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def:%>ušo # ;
+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def:%>ušajiem # ;
+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def:%>ušos # ;
+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def:%>ušajos # ;
+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def:%>ušie # ;
+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>usi # ;
+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ušas # ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ušai # ;
+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>ušu # ;
+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef:%>ušā # ;
+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ušas # ;
+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ušu # ;
+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>ušām # ;
+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ušas # ;
+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef:%>ušās # ;
+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:%>usī # ;
+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:%>ušās # ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:%>ušajai # ;
+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:%>ušo # ;
+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def:%>ušajā # ;
+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def:%>usī # ;
+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:%>ušās # ;
+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:%>ušo # ;
+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:%>ušajām # ;
+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:%>ušās # ;
+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def:%>ušajās # ;
+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def:%>ušās # ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc: 
